District of Columbia statutes.
8-103.13

Mayor authorized to regulate construction.

(a)

The Mayor may regulate construction that bears upon the quality of the waters of the District.

(b)

No person shall construct a treatment facility which has not been approved by the Mayor before construction begins.

Mar. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-188, § 14, 32 DCR 919
1981 Ed., § 6-933.